Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 2.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201082-329
Works of art;
Nebraska Arts Council; maintain inventory; inspect; recommend procedures.

The Nebraska Arts Council shall maintain an inventory of all
works of art purchased under sections 82-317 to 82-329, 85-106 to 85-106.03,
and 85-304 to 85-304.03 and shall inspect each work of art on a regular schedule to determine
its condition. The Nebraska Arts Council may recommend procedures for regular
maintenance, preservation, and security and for the repair of any damaged
work of art.

Laws 1978, LB 664, § 21;

Laws 2010, LB1063, § 2.
July 15, 2010